Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 9 Intestate Succession
28-9-214. Tables of descents.

The heritable estate of an intestate as defined in §28-9-206 shall pass as follows upon the intestate's death:

First, to the children of the intestate and the descendants of each child of the intestate who may have predeceased the intestate. The children and descendants will take per capita or per stirpes according to §§ 28-9-204 and 28-9-205;

Second, if the intestate is survived by no descendant, to the intestate's surviving spouse unless the intestate and the surviving spouse had been continuously married less than three (3) years next preceding the death of the intestate, in which event the surviving spouse will take merely fifty percent (50%) of the intestate's heritable estate;

Third, if the intestate is survived by no descendant or spouse, to the intestate's surviving parents, sharing equally, or to the sole surviving parent if only one (1) of them shall be living;

Fourth, if the intestate is survived by no descendant but is survived by a spouse to whom the intestate has been continuously married less than three (3) years next preceding the death of the intestate, the entire portion of his or her heritable estate which does not pass to the surviving spouse under subdivision (2) of this section shall pass to the intestate's surviving parents, sharing equally, or to the sole surviving parent if only one (1) of them shall be living;

Fifth, if the intestate is survived by no descendant or parent, then all of his or her heritable estate which under subdivisions (3) and (4) of this section would have vested in the intestate's surviving parent or parents will pass to the intestate's brothers and sisters and the descendants of any brothers and sisters of the intestate who may have predeceased the intestate, such brothers, sisters, and descendants taking per capita or per stirpes according to §§ 28-9-204 and 28-9-205;

Sixth, if the intestate is survived by no descendant, then in respect to such portion of his or her heritable estate as does not pass under subdivisions (2)-(5) of this section, the inheriting class will be the surviving grandparents, uncles, and aunts of the intestate. In this situation, each surviving grandparent shall take the same share as each surviving uncle and aunt, and no distinction shall be made between the paternal and maternal sides. In other words, a maternal grandparent, uncle, or aunt shall take the same share as a paternal grandparent, uncle, or aunt and vice versa. If any uncle or aunt of the intestate shall predecease the intestate, the descendants of the deceased uncle or aunt will take, per capita or per stirpes according to §§ 28-9-204 and 28-9-205, the share the decedent would have taken if he or she had survived the intestate;

Seventh, if the intestate is survived by no descendant, then in respect to the portion of his or her estate as does not pass under subdivisions (2)-(6) of this section, the inheriting class will be the surviving great-grandparents and great-uncles and great-aunts of the intestate. In this situation, each surviving great-grandparent shall take the same share as each surviving great-uncle and great-aunt, and no distinction shall be made between the paternal and maternal sides. In other words, a maternal great-grandparent, great-uncle, or great-aunt shall take the same share as a paternal great-grandparent, great-uncle, or great-aunt and vice versa. If any great-uncle or great-aunt shall predecease the intestate, the descendants of the decedent will take, per capita or per stirpes according to §§ 28-9-204 and 28-9-205, the share the decedent would have taken if he or she had survived the intestate; and

Eighth, if heirs capable of inheriting the entire heritable estate cannot be found within the inheriting classes prescribed in subdivisions (1)-(7) of this section, the real and personal property of the intestate, or the portion not passing under those subdivisions, shall pass according to § 28-9-215, devolution when all or some portion of a heritable estate does not pass under this section.

Cross References. Dower and curtesy, §28-11-101 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Estate Planning with Disclaimers in Arkansas, 27 Ark. L. Rev. 411.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Averill & Brantley, A Comparison of Arkansas's Current Law Concerning Succession, Wills, and Other Donative Transfers with Article II of the 1990 Uniform Probate Code, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 631.

In a suit to contest a will, where no evidence was shown and no contention was made that the divorce and remarriage intervened between the time of marriage and the death of husband, the court was right in refusing to hear that the widow had abandoned her marriage with the decedent and thus was not “continuously married.” Mabry v. Mabry, 259 Ark. 622, 535 S.W.2d 824 (1976).

Inheritance is governed by the lex rei sitae. Crossett Lumber Co. v. Files, 104 Ark. 600, 149 S.W. 908 (1912); Wilson v. Storthz, 117 Ark. 418, 175 S.W. 45 (1915) (decision under prior law).

The distinction between ancestral estates and new acquisitions in the devolution of property by intestacy was abolished in Arkansas by Acts 1969, No. 303 and has not been reinstated. Accordingly, where a decedent died intestate and without descendants in 1982, the decedent's property, which consisted principally of lands that were formerly owned by her late father, all went to her surviving husband, to whom she had been married for 53 years. Heath v. Clear, 280 Ark. 482, 659 S.W.2d 504 (1983).

Where the four children of the intestate who were alive at his death and the five children of a son who predeceased him had executed disclaimers of interest in the estate with the purpose of having certain property pass to his widow as the surviving spouse, but the other 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren did not execute disclaimers, the property in question did not pass to the widow because under this section the estate would pass to the widow only if there were no surviving descendants. The disclaimers in this case resulted in the property in issue passing to the 12 grandchildren and 10 great grandchildren who did not execute disclaimers and not to the widow as the surviving spouse. Hunt v. United States, 566 F. Supp. 356 (E.D. Ark. 1983).

Escheat occurs immediately upon the death of the intestate, not when the probate court enters its order finding the estate must escheat. Newton County v. West, 293 Ark. 461, 739 S.W.2d 141 (1987).

In a case seeking to determine heirship, a surviving spouse was properly awarded a one-sixth interest in property, even though she had waived her right to dower in a conveyance, because she received her interest after the death of her husband, pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section.Scroggin v. Scroggin, 103 Ark. App. 144, 286 S.W.3d 758 (2008).

In a probate dispute regarding the estate of the decedent, because the decedent's aunts, uncles, and grandparents had predeceased her, the per capita distribution of the estate at the first-cousin level under §28-9-205(a)(2) was proper as it was the first level at which the intestate had surviving heirs, regardless of what level was used to determine the inheriting class under this section.Stokan v. Estate of Cann, 100 Ark. App. 216, 266 S.W.3d 210 (2007).

Cited: McDonald v. Petty, 254 Ark. 705, 496 S.W.2d 365 (1973); Maryland Cas. Co. v. Rowe, 256 Ark. 221, 506 S.W.2d 569 (1974); Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979); Wilson v. Kemp, 7 Ark. App. 44, 644 S.W.2d 306 (1982); Smith v. Wright, 300 Ark. 416, 779 S.W.2d 177 (1989); Wisdom v. McBride, 311 Ark. 492, 845 S.W.2d 6 (1993); Douglas v. Holbert, 335 Ark. 305, 983 S.W.2d 392 (1998); Cockrum v. Fox, 359 Ark. 508, 199 S.W.3d 69 (2004); Dotson v. Dotson, 2009 Ark. App. 819, 372 S.W.3d 398 (2009).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-149.

28-9-215. Devolution where no heir under § 28-9-214.

If an heir to the heritable estate, or some portion thereof, cannot be found under §28-9-214, then the portion of the heritable estate as does not pass under §28-9-214 will pass as follows:

First, to the surviving spouse of the intestate even though they had been married less than three (3) years;

Second, if there is no such surviving spouse, to the heirs, determined as of the date of the intestate's death in accordance with § 28-9-214, of the intestate's deceased spouse, meaning the spouse to whom the intestate was last married if there had been more than one (1) marriage.

However, in case a marriage was terminated by divorce rather than by death, the heirs of the divorced spouse shall not inherit; and

Third, if there is no person capable of inheriting under subdivision (1) or (2) of this section, the estate shall escheat to the county wherein the decedent resided at death.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Probate, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 597.

Averill & Brantley, A Comparison of Arkansas's Current Law Concerning Succession, Wills, and Other Donative Transfers with Article II of the 1990 Uniform Probate Code, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 631.

The proof need not show to a certainty that the deceased left no other heirs and the testimony of a widow alone raises a prima facie case in her own favor, throwing the burden of proof upon a stranger to show that there were other heirs. Carrier v. Comstock, 108 Ark. 515, 159 S.W. 1097 (1913) (decision under prior law).

Escheat occurs immediately upon the death of the intestate, not when the probate court enters its order finding the estate must escheat. Newton County v. West, 293 Ark. 461, 739 S.W.2d 141 (1987).

Cited: Wilson v. Kemp, 7 Ark. App. 44, 644 S.W.2d 306 (1982).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 20; 1985, No. 703, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-150.

28-9-216. Advancements.

If a person dies intestate as to all his or her estate, property which he or she gave in his or her lifetime to an heir shall be treated as an advancement against the heir's share of the estate if declared in writing by the decedent or acknowledged in writing by the heir to be an advancement.

For this purpose, the property advanced shall be valued as of the time the heir came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of death of the decedent, whichever first occurs.

If the recipient of the property fails to survive the decedent, the property shall not be taken into account in computing the share of the recipient's descendants.

An “advancement” is a gift by a parent to a child in anticipation of what it is supposed the child will be entitled to on the death of the parent. Holland v. Bonner, 142 Ark. 214, 218 S.W. 665, 26 A.L.R. 1101 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Whether a conveyance or transfer of money or property by a parent to a child is an advancement or a gift depends on the intention of the parties, and if it appears that a gift is intended, it will not be treated as an advancement. Holland v. Bonner, 142 Ark. 214, 218 S.W. 665, 26 A.L.R. 1101 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Proof that a parent conveyed land worth from $6,000 to $8,000 for $500 was held a prima facie case of advancement to the extent at least of the difference between the consideration expressed and the real value of the land conveyed. Holland v. Bonner, 142 Ark. 214, 218 S.W. 665, 26 A.L.R. 1101 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Where consideration was nominal and deed was not recorded until grantor's death more than a year after execution, court was justified in holding that presumption of law as to advancements had not been overcome. Neal v. Neal, 194 Ark. 226, 106 S.W.2d 595 (1937) (decision under prior law).

In the absence of clear evidence to the contrary, a gift of a horse and of an insurance policy from a father to his daughter was presumed to be an advancement. Culberhouse v. Culberhouse, 68 Ark. 405, 59 S.W. 38 (1900) (decision under prior law).

A voluntary conveyance of land by a father to his son will, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, be presumed to be an advancement. Goodwin v. Parnell, 69 Ark. 629, 65 S.W. 427 (1901) (decision under prior law).

The presumption is that conveyances from a father to his daughters are intended as advancements. Jackson v. Richardson, 182 Ark. 997, 33 S.W.2d 1095 (1930) (decision under prior law).

Where a parent makes a voluntary conveyance or gift to his child, the law presumes that it is an advancement and that the parent intends that all his children shall equally share not only in what remains at his death, but in all that came from him. Neal v. Neal, 194 Ark. 226, 106 S.W.2d 595 (1937) (decision under prior law).

The doctrine of advancements does not apply to testate estates. Blanks v. Clark, 68 Ark. 98, 56 S.W. 1063 (1900) (decision under prior law).

The value of an advancement of a policy of life insurance payable to a daughter at her father's death was to be estimated as of the time when her right of beneficial enjoyment accrued, which was at the death of the insured. Culberhouse v. Culberhouse, 68 Ark. 405, 59 S.W. 38 (1900) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-153.

28-9-217. Debts to decedent.

A debt owed to the decedent shall not be charged against the intestate share of any person except the debtor. If the debtor fails to survive the decedent, the debt shall not be taken into account in computing the share of the debtor's descendants.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-154.

28-9-218. Doctrine of first purchaser abolished.

This subchapter is intended to abolish the common law rule of the blood of the first purchaser under which in the case of successive inheritances of land the intestate's property would descend only to such of his or her heirs as were of the blood of the next preceding ancestor in the line of successive descents who acquired title by purchase, that is to say, by any method other than descent.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-146.

28-9-219. Distinction between ancestral estates and new acquisitions abolished.

Only for the purposes of intestate succession, the distinction between “ancestral estate” and “new acquisitions” in respect to real estate owned by an intestate is abolished.

The devolution of real estate and personal property which the intestate acquired by gift, devise, or descent from some ancestor shall be controlled by the same rules which apply to the devolution of real estate and personal property acquired by the intestate in any other manner.

The distinction between ancestral estates and new acquisitions in the devolution of property by intestacy was abolished in Arkansas by Acts 1969, No. 303 and has not been reinstated. Accordingly, where a decedent died intestate and without descendants in 1982, the decedent's property, which consisted principally of lands that were formerly owned by her late father, all went to her surviving husband. Heath v. Clear, 280 Ark. 482, 659 S.W.2d 504 (1983).

Since the provisions of this section do not take effect until the death of the testator, where the residuary clause of the will of testator left all property to a brother who survived testator and to a sister who predeceased testator, the sister could not have been an heir of the testator at the time of his death for she had already died. Eckert Heirs v. Harlow, 251 Ark. 1018, 476 S.W.2d 244 (1972).

Am. Jur. 23 Am. Jur. 2d, Desc. & D., §§ 56-58.

Ark. L. Rev.

Some Practical Aspects to Drafting in the Estate Planning Field, 21 Ark. L. Rev. 5.

C.J.S. 26B C.J.S., Desc. & D., §§ 14, 15.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brantley and Effland, Inheritance, The Share of the Surviving Spouse, and Wills: Arkansas Law and the Uniform Probate Code Compared, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Because of the enactment of subchapter 2 of this chapter by Acts 2005, No. 74, the existing provisions of this chapter have been designated as subchapter 1.

Acts 2005, No. 74, § 2, provided:

“Effective date of repeal. Except as provided in §28-10-211, §§28-10-101 —28-10-112 shall be repealed and superseded by §§28-10-201 —28-10-211 on January 1, 2006.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 74, § 3: Jan. 1, 2006, by its own terms.

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 74, § 3: repeal effective by its own terms January 1, 2006.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 74, § 3, effective January 1, 2006. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

28-10-101. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-124.

28-10-102. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 2; 1959, No. 203, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-125.

28-10-103. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 3; 1959, No. 203, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-126.

28-10-104. This was originally a reserved section, because Section 4 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (U.L.A.), which provides for the distribution of community property, was not enacted by Acts 1941, No. 15.

28-10-105. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-127.

28-10-106. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-127n.

28-10-107. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 6; 1959, No. 203, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-128.

28-10-108. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-129.

28-10-109. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-130.

28-10-110. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-130n.

28-10-111. Acts 1941, No. 15, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-130n.

28-10-112. This was originally a reserved section, because Section 11 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (U.L.A.), which is an effective date provision, was not enacted by Acts 1941, No. 15.

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 74, § 1 provided: “Effective date.

“(a)This subchapter takes effect January 1, 2006.

“(b)On the effective date of this subchapter:

“(1)an act done before the effective date in any proceeding and any accrued right is not impaired by this subchapter. If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute before the effective date, the provisions remain in force with respect to that right; and

“(2)any rule of construction or presumption provided in this subchapter applies to instruments executed and multiple-party accounts opened before the effective date unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.”

Acts 2007, No. 240, § 5: Mar. 9, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current extremely harsh remedy under the rule against perpetuities that renders a grantor's entire grant void if the grant violates the rule is outdated and should be replaced; that the common law rule fosters litigation at great cost to the citizens of this state because of its many complexities, with often devastating consequences to estates; and that the revision by this act of the common law remedy to permit the likely occurrence that a grant will vest or to permit a court to reform a grant that does not vest in the manner that most likely approximate the transferor's manifested plan is immediately necessary for the good of the citizens of this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-148.

28-9-220. Conveyance to heirs or next of kin — Doctrine of worthier title abolished.

When any property is limited, mediately or immediately, in an otherwise effective testamentary conveyance, in form or in effect, to the heirs or next of kin of the conveyor, or to a person or persons who on the death of the conveyor are some or all of his or her heirs or next of kin, the conveyees acquire the property by purchase and not by descent.

When any property is limited in an otherwise effective conveyance inter vivos, in form or in effect, to the heirs or next of kin of the conveyor, which conveyance creates one (1) or more prior interests in favor of a person or persons in existence, the conveyance operates in favor of such heirs or next of kin by purchase and not by descent.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 303, §§ 21, 22; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-151, 61-152.

28-9-221. Child conceived after death of parent.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, a child conceived after the death of a decedent who specifically authorized the decedent's surviving spouse, in a writing that is either notarized or witnessed by a licensed physician or a person acting under the supervision of a licensed physician, to use the decedent's gametes after the decedent's death shall be deemed the child of the decedent with the right to inherit from the decedent if the child is conceived within twelve (12) months following the death of the decedent and born within nineteen (19) months following the death of the decedent.

This section is retroactive to December 1, 2009, solely for the purpose of establishing a posthumous child's entitlement to Social Security benefits under the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 402(d), deriving from the decedent.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1256, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Inheritance Code of 1969